New Jersey, session 221, S1159.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Commissioner of Banking and Insurance shall develop a standard prior authorization request form to be utilized by all network providers for the purpose of submitting requests for utilization review determinations for coverage of prescription drug benefits.  A payer shall make the standard prior authorization request form available to, and shall accept it from, network providers in paper and electronic form. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.